incubator/apertium-hi-en-wx/apertium_hn.dix
<pardef n="uT/a__v">
<e><p><l>anA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>anA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>anA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>anA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ane</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ane</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ane</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ane</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>anI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>anI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>anI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>anI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>anIM</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>anIM</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>anIM</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>anIM</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awe</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awe</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awe</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awe</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awIM</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awIM</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awIM</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awIM</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>akara</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>akara</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>akara</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>akara</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>akara</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>akara</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>akara</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>akara</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>akara</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>akara</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>akara</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>akara</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>akara</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>akara</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>akara</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>akara</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="ata"><i>at</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Badaka"><i>Badak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="baka"><i>bak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Bara"><i>Bar</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="baxa"><i>bax</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="bAzXa"><i>bAzX</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="bicaka"><i>bicak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="BIga"><i>BIg</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="bisAra"><i>bisAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="BOMka"><i>BOMk</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="buna"><i>bun</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="cahaka"><i>cahak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="CAna"><i>CAn</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="cAta"><i>cAt</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="cewa"><i>cew</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Cika"><i>Cik</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Cipa"><i>Cip</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="cOMka"><i>cOMk</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="cuna"><i>cun</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="dakAra"><i>dakAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="dara"><i>dar</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="diga"><i>dig</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="gAda"><i>gAd</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Gera"><i>Ger</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Gozpa"><i>Gozp</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="GUma"><i>GUm</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="GUzta"><i>GUzt</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="hAzka"><i>hAzk</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="huMkAra"><i>huMkAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="jakada"><i>jakad</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="jana"><i>jan</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="JazJoda"><i>JazJod</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="joda"><i>jod</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="JUma"><i>JUm</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Kadaka"><i>Kadak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="karAha"><i>karAh</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="kAwa"><i>kAw</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Kila"><i>Kil</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="KOla"><i>KOl</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="kuhaka"><i>kuhak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="kuwara"><i>kuwar</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="lalaca"><i>lalac</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="laWAda"><i>laWAd</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="lIpa"><i>lIp</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="lUta"><i>lUt</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="mApa"><i>mAp</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="mAzga"><i>mAzg</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="muda"><i>mud</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="nAca"><i>nAc</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="niBa"><i>niB</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="niKAra"><i>niKAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Paba"><i>Pab</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="pahana"><i>pahan</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Pala"><i>Pal</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="pasAra"><i>pasAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="pAxa"><i>pAx</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="PeMka"><i>PeMk</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Pira"><i>Pir</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="poMCa"><i>poMC</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="PUla"><i>PUl</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="raca"><i>rac</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="reMga"><i>reMg</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="rUsa"><i>rUs</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="saka"><i>sak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="saXa"><i>saX</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="sIJa"><i>sIJ</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="siXAra"><i>siXAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="sulaga"><i>sulag</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Tahara"><i>Tahar</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="tatola"><i>tatol</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="TiTaka"><i>TiTak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="tUta"><i>tUt</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="uBAra"><i>uBAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="uGAda"><i>uGAd</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="uKAda"><i>uKAd</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="uPana"><i>uPan</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="vaMca"><i>vaMc</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="waga"><i>wag</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="WAma"><i>WAm</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="warASa"><i>warAS</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="wurapa"><i>wurap</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="xahAda"><i>xahAd</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="xapata"><i>xapat</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="xiKa"><i>xiK</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
